fdic-to-hunspell/resultat/dictionaries.catalan.aff
FLAG long
# Model de conjugació: prevenir
SFX 7A Y 109
SFX 7A r r/_C_Y ir
SFX 7A enir indre/_D_Y ir
SFX 7A r nt/_C ir
SFX 7A enir ingut/_V_Y ir
SFX 7A ir gut/_V_Y ir
SFX 7A enir inguda/_Y ir
SFX 7A ir guda/_Y ir
SFX 7A enir inguts/_Y ir
SFX 7A ir guts/_Y ir
SFX 7A enir ingudes/_Y ir
SFX 7A ir gudes/_Y ir
SFX 7A enir inc/_Z ir
SFX 7A ir c/_Z ir
SFX 7A ir s/_Z ir
SFX 7A enir é/_Z ir
SFX 7A r m/_Z ir
SFX 7A r u/_Z ir
SFX 7A ir en/_Z ir
SFX 7A r a/_Z ir
SFX 7A r es/_Z ir
SFX 7A r a/_Z ir
SFX 7A ir íem/_Z ir
SFX 7A ir íeu/_Z ir
SFX 7A r en/_Z ir
SFX 7A enir inguí/_Z ir
SFX 7A ir guí/_Z ir
SFX 7A enir ingueres/_Z ir
SFX 7A ir gueres/_Z ir
SFX 7A enir ingué/_Z ir
SFX 7A ir gué/_Z ir
SFX 7A enir inguérem/_Z ir
SFX 7A ir guérem/_Z ir
SFX 7A enir inguéreu/_Z ir
SFX 7A ir guéreu/_Z ir
SFX 7A enir ingueren/_Z ir
SFX 7A ir gueren/_Z ir
SFX 7A enir indré/_Z ir
SFX 7A ir dré/_Z ir
SFX 7A enir indràs/_Z ir
SFX 7A ir dràs/_Z ir
SFX 7A enir indrà/_Z ir
SFX 7A ir drà/_Z ir
SFX 7A enir indrem/_Z ir
SFX 7A ir drem/_Z ir
SFX 7A enir indreu/_Z ir
SFX 7A ir dreu/_Z ir
SFX 7A enir indran/_Z ir
SFX 7A ir dran/_Z ir
SFX 7A enir indria/_Z ir
SFX 7A ir dria/_Z ir
SFX 7A enir indries/_Z ir
SFX 7A ir dries/_Z ir
SFX 7A enir indria/_Z ir
SFX 7A ir dria/_Z ir
SFX 7A enir indríem/_Z ir
SFX 7A ir dríem/_Z ir
SFX 7A enir indríeu/_Z ir
SFX 7A ir dríeu/_Z ir
SFX 7A enir indrien/_Z ir
SFX 7A ir drien/_Z ir
SFX 7A enir inga/_Z ir
SFX 7A ir gui/_Z ir
SFX 7A enir ingui/_Z ir
SFX 7A enir ingues/_Z ir
SFX 7A ir guis/_Z ir
SFX 7A enir inguis/_Z ir
SFX 7A enir inga/_Z ir
SFX 7A ir gui/_Z ir
SFX 7A enir ingui/_Z ir
SFX 7A enir inguem/_Z ir
SFX 7A ir guem/_Z ir
SFX 7A enir ingueu/_Z ir
SFX 7A ir gueu/_Z ir
SFX 7A enir inguen/_Z ir
SFX 7A ir guin/_Z ir
SFX 7A enir inguin/_Z ir
SFX 7A enir ingués/_Z ir
SFX 7A enir inguera/_Z ir
SFX 7A ir gués/_Z ir
SFX 7A enir inguessis/_Z ir
SFX 7A enir ingueres/_Z ir
SFX 7A enir inguesses/_Z ir
SFX 7A ir guessis/_Z ir
SFX 7A enir ingués/_Z ir
SFX 7A enir inguera/_Z ir
SFX 7A ir gués/_Z ir
SFX 7A enir inguéssim/_Z ir
SFX 7A enir inguérem/_Z ir
SFX 7A enir inguéssem/_Z ir
SFX 7A ir guéssim/_Z ir
SFX 7A enir inguéssiu/_Z ir
SFX 7A enir inguéreu/_Z ir
SFX 7A enir inguésseu/_Z ir
SFX 7A ir guéssiu/_Z ir
SFX 7A enir inguessin/_Z ir
SFX 7A enir ingueren/_Z ir
SFX 7A enir inguessen/_Z ir
SFX 7A ir guessin/_Z ir
SFX 7A enir én/_C ir
SFX 7A enir ín/_C ir
SFX 7A enir inga/_D ir
SFX 7A ir gui/_D ir
SFX 7A enir ingui/_D ir
SFX 7A enir inguem/_C ir
SFX 7A ir guem/_C ir
SFX 7A r u/_C ir
SFX 7A enir inguen/_C ir
SFX 7A ir guin/_C ir
SFX 7A enir inguin/_C ir
# Model de conjugació: pruir
SFX 7B Y 76
SFX 7B r r/_C_Y ir
SFX 7B r nt/_C ir
SFX 7B ir ït/_V_Y ir
SFX 7B ir ïda/_Y ir
SFX 7B ir ïts/_Y ir
SFX 7B ir ïdes/_Y ir
SFX 7B ir u/_Z ir
SFX 7B ir o/_Z ir
SFX 7B ir s/_Z ir
SFX 7B ir us/_Z ir
SFX 7B ir 0/_Z ir
SFX 7B ir u/_Z ir
SFX 7B ir ïm/_Z ir
SFX 7B ir ïu/_Z ir
SFX 7B ir en/_Z ir
SFX 7B ir ïa/_Z ir
SFX 7B ir ïes/_Z ir
SFX 7B ir ïa/_Z ir
SFX 7B ir íem/_Z ir
SFX 7B ir íeu/_Z ir
SFX 7B ir ïen/_Z ir
SFX 7B ir í/_Z ir
SFX 7B ir ïres/_Z ir
SFX 7B ir í/_Z ir
SFX 7B ir írem/_Z ir
SFX 7B ir íreu/_Z ir
SFX 7B ir ïren/_Z ir
SFX 7B r ré/_Z ir
SFX 7B r ràs/_Z ir
SFX 7B r rà/_Z ir
SFX 7B r rem/_Z ir
SFX 7B r reu/_Z ir
SFX 7B r ran/_Z ir
SFX 7B r ria/_Z ir
SFX 7B r ries/_Z ir
SFX 7B r ria/_Z ir
SFX 7B r ríem/_Z ir
SFX 7B r ríeu/_Z ir
SFX 7B r rien/_Z ir
SFX 7B ir a/_Z ir
SFX 7B ir ï/_Z ir
SFX 7B ir es/_Z ir
SFX 7B ir ïs/_Z ir
SFX 7B ir a/_Z ir
SFX 7B ir ï/_Z ir
SFX 7B ir ïm/_Z ir
SFX 7B ir ïguem/_Z ir
SFX 7B ir ïu/_Z ir
SFX 7B ir ïgueu/_Z ir
SFX 7B ir en/_Z ir
SFX 7B ir ïn/_Z ir
SFX 7B ir ís/_Z ir
SFX 7B ir ïra/_Z ir
SFX 7B ir ïssis/_Z ir
SFX 7B ir ïres/_Z ir
SFX 7B ir ïsses/_Z ir
SFX 7B ir ís/_Z ir
SFX 7B ir ïra/_Z ir
SFX 7B ir íssim/_Z ir
SFX 7B ir írem/_Z ir
SFX 7B ir íssem/_Z ir
SFX 7B ir íssiu/_Z ir
SFX 7B ir íreu/_Z ir
SFX 7B ir ísseu/_Z ir
SFX 7B ir ïssin/_Z ir
SFX 7B ir ïren/_Z ir
SFX 7B ir ïssen/_Z ir
SFX 7B ir 0/_C ir
SFX 7B ir u/_C ir
SFX 7B ir a/_D ir
SFX 7B ir ï/_D ir
SFX 7B ir ïm/_C ir
SFX 7B ir ïguem/_C ir
SFX 7B ir ïu/_C ir
SFX 7B ir en/_C ir
SFX 7B ir ïn/_C ir
# Model de conjugació: pudir
SFX 7C Y 70
SFX 7C r r/_C_Y ir
SFX 7C r nt/_C ir
SFX 7C r t/_V_Y ir
SFX 7C r da/_Y ir
SFX 7C r ts/_Y ir
SFX 7C r des/_Y ir
SFX 7C ir o/_Z ir
SFX 7C dir t/_Z ir
SFX 7C dir ts/_Z ir
SFX 7C dir t/_Z ir
SFX 7C r m/_Z ir
SFX 7C r u/_Z ir
SFX 7C ir en/_Z ir
SFX 7C r a/_Z ir
SFX 7C r es/_Z ir
SFX 7C r a/_Z ir
SFX 7C ir íem/_Z ir
SFX 7C ir íeu/_Z ir
SFX 7C r en/_Z ir
SFX 7C ir í/_Z ir
SFX 7C r res/_Z ir
SFX 7C ir í/_Z ir
SFX 7C ir írem/_Z ir
SFX 7C ir íreu/_Z ir
SFX 7C r ren/_Z ir
SFX 7C r ré/_Z ir
SFX 7C r ràs/_Z ir
SFX 7C r rà/_Z ir
SFX 7C r rem/_Z ir
SFX 7C r reu/_Z ir
SFX 7C r ran/_Z ir
SFX 7C r ria/_Z ir
SFX 7C r ries/_Z ir
SFX 7C r ria/_Z ir
SFX 7C r ríem/_Z ir
SFX 7C r ríeu/_Z ir
SFX 7C r rien/_Z ir
SFX 7C ir a/_Z ir
SFX 7C r 0/_Z ir
SFX 7C ir es/_Z ir
SFX 7C r s/_Z ir
SFX 7C ir a/_Z ir
SFX 7C r 0/_Z ir
SFX 7C r m/_Z ir
SFX 7C r u/_Z ir
SFX 7C ir en/_Z ir
SFX 7C r n/_Z ir
SFX 7C ir ís/_Z ir
SFX 7C r ra/_Z ir
SFX 7C r ssis/_Z ir
SFX 7C r res/_Z ir
SFX 7C r sses/_Z ir
SFX 7C ir ís/_Z ir
SFX 7C r ra/_Z ir
SFX 7C ir íssim/_Z ir
SFX 7C ir írem/_Z ir
SFX 7C ir íssem/_Z ir
SFX 7C ir íssiu/_Z ir
SFX 7C ir íreu/_Z ir
SFX 7C ir ísseu/_Z ir
SFX 7C r ssin/_Z ir
SFX 7C r ren/_Z ir
SFX 7C r ssen/_Z ir
SFX 7C dir t/_C ir
SFX 7C ir a/_D ir
SFX 7C r 0/_D ir
SFX 7C r m/_C ir
SFX 7C r u/_C ir
SFX 7C ir en/_C ir
SFX 7C r n/_C ir
# Model de conjugació: raure
SFX 7D Y 73
SFX 7D e e/_D_Y re
SFX 7D ure ent/_C re
SFX 7D ure gut/_V_Y re
SFX 7D ure s/_V_Y re
SFX 7D ure guda/_Y re
SFX 7D ure sa/_Y re
SFX 7D ure guts/_Y re
SFX 7D ure sos/_Y re
SFX 7D ure gudes/_Y re
SFX 7D ure ses/_Y re
SFX 7D ure c/_Z re
SFX 7D re s/_Z re
SFX 7D re 0/_Z re
SFX 7D ure em/_Z re
SFX 7D ure eu/_Z re
SFX 7D re en/_Z re
SFX 7D ure ïa/_Z re
SFX 7D ure ïes/_Z re
SFX 7D ure ïa/_Z re
SFX 7D ure íem/_Z re
SFX 7D ure íeu/_Z re
SFX 7D ure ïen/_Z re
SFX 7D ure guí/_Z re
SFX 7D ure gueres/_Z re
SFX 7D ure gué/_Z re
SFX 7D ure guérem/_Z re
SFX 7D ure guéreu/_Z re
SFX 7D ure gueren/_Z re
SFX 7D e é/_Z re
SFX 7D e às/_Z re
SFX 7D e à/_Z re
SFX 7D e em/_Z re
SFX 7D e eu/_Z re
SFX 7D e an/_Z re
SFX 7D e ia/_Z re
SFX 7D e ies/_Z re
SFX 7D e ia/_Z re
SFX 7D e íem/_Z re
SFX 7D e íeu/_Z re
SFX 7D e ien/_Z re
SFX 7D ure ga/_Z re
SFX 7D ure gui/_Z re
SFX 7D ure gues/_Z re
SFX 7D ure guis/_Z re
SFX 7D ure ga/_Z re
SFX 7D ure gui/_Z re
SFX 7D ure guem/_Z re
SFX 7D ure gueu/_Z re
SFX 7D ure guen/_Z re
SFX 7D ure guin/_Z re
SFX 7D ure gués/_Z re
SFX 7D ure guera/_Z re
SFX 7D ure guessis/_Z re
SFX 7D ure gueres/_Z re
SFX 7D ure guesses/_Z re
SFX 7D ure gués/_Z re
SFX 7D ure guera/_Z re
SFX 7D ure guéssim/_Z re
SFX 7D ure guérem/_Z re
SFX 7D ure guéssem/_Z re
SFX 7D ure guéssiu/_Z re
SFX 7D ure guéreu/_Z re
SFX 7D ure guésseu/_Z re
SFX 7D ure guessin/_Z re
SFX 7D ure gueren/_Z re
SFX 7D ure guessen/_Z re
SFX 7D re 0/_C re
SFX 7D ure ga/_D re
SFX 7D ure gui/_D re
SFX 7D ure guem/_C re
SFX 7D ure eu/_C re
SFX 7D ure guen/_C re
SFX 7D ure guin/_C re
# Model de conjugació: recoure
SFX 7E Y 69
SFX 7E e e/_D_Y re
SFX 7E ure ent/_C re
SFX 7E oure uit/_V_Y re
SFX 7E oure uita/_Y re
SFX 7E oure uits/_Y re
SFX 7E oure uites/_Y re
SFX 7E ure c/_Z re
SFX 7E re s/_Z re
SFX 7E re 0/_Z re
SFX 7E ure em/_Z re
SFX 7E ure eu/_Z re
SFX 7E re en/_Z re
SFX 7E ure ïa/_Z re
SFX 7E ure ïes/_Z re
SFX 7E ure ïa/_Z re
SFX 7E ure íem/_Z re
SFX 7E ure íeu/_Z re
SFX 7E ure ïen/_Z re
SFX 7E ure guí/_Z re
SFX 7E ure gueres/_Z re
SFX 7E ure gué/_Z re
SFX 7E ure guérem/_Z re
SFX 7E ure guéreu/_Z re
SFX 7E ure gueren/_Z re
SFX 7E e é/_Z re
SFX 7E e às/_Z re
SFX 7E e à/_Z re
SFX 7E e em/_Z re
SFX 7E e eu/_Z re
SFX 7E e an/_Z re
SFX 7E e ia/_Z re
SFX 7E e ies/_Z re
SFX 7E e ia/_Z re
SFX 7E e íem/_Z re
SFX 7E e íeu/_Z re
SFX 7E e ien/_Z re
SFX 7E ure ga/_Z re
SFX 7E ure gui/_Z re
SFX 7E ure gues/_Z re
SFX 7E ure guis/_Z re
SFX 7E ure ga/_Z re
SFX 7E ure gui/_Z re
SFX 7E ure guem/_Z re
SFX 7E ure gueu/_Z re
SFX 7E ure guen/_Z re
SFX 7E ure guin/_Z re
SFX 7E ure gués/_Z re
SFX 7E ure guera/_Z re
SFX 7E ure guessis/_Z re
SFX 7E ure gueres/_Z re
SFX 7E ure guesses/_Z re
SFX 7E ure gués/_Z re
SFX 7E ure guera/_Z re
SFX 7E ure guéssim/_Z re
SFX 7E ure guérem/_Z re
SFX 7E ure guéssem/_Z re
SFX 7E ure guéssiu/_Z re
SFX 7E ure guéreu/_Z re
SFX 7E ure guésseu/_Z re
SFX 7E ure guessin/_Z re
SFX 7E ure gueren/_Z re
SFX 7E ure guessen/_Z re
SFX 7E re 0/_C re
SFX 7E ure ga/_D re
SFX 7E ure gui/_D re
SFX 7E ure guem/_C re
SFX 7E ure eu/_C re
SFX 7E ure guen/_C re
SFX 7E ure guin/_C re
# Model de conjugació: reeixir
SFX 7F Y 98
SFX 7F r r/_C_Y ir
SFX 7F r nt/_C ir
SFX 7F r t/_V_Y ir
SFX 7F r da/_Y ir
SFX 7F r ts/_Y ir
SFX 7F r des/_Y ir
SFX 7F eixir ïxo/_Z ir
SFX 7F eixir ïsc/_Z ir
SFX 7F eixir ïxes/_Z ir
SFX 7F eixir ïx/_Z ir
SFX 7F r m/_Z ir
SFX 7F r u/_Z ir
SFX 7F eixir ïxen/_Z ir
SFX 7F r a/_Z ir
SFX 7F r es/_Z ir
SFX 7F r a/_Z ir
SFX 7F ir íem/_Z ir
SFX 7F ir íeu/_Z ir
SFX 7F r en/_Z ir
SFX 7F ir í/_Z ir
SFX 7F eixir ïsquí/_Z ir
SFX 7F r res/_Z ir
SFX 7F eixir ïsqueres/_Z ir
SFX 7F ir í/_Z ir
SFX 7F eixir ïsqué/_Z ir
SFX 7F ir írem/_Z ir
SFX 7F eixir ïsquérem/_Z ir
SFX 7F ir íreu/_Z ir
SFX 7F eixir ïsquéreu/_Z ir
SFX 7F r ren/_Z ir
SFX 7F eixir ïsqueren/_Z ir
SFX 7F r ré/_Z ir
SFX 7F r ràs/_Z ir
SFX 7F r rà/_Z ir
SFX 7F r rem/_Z ir
SFX 7F r reu/_Z ir
SFX 7F r ran/_Z ir
SFX 7F r ria/_Z ir
SFX 7F r ries/_Z ir
SFX 7F r ria/_Z ir
SFX 7F r ríem/_Z ir
SFX 7F r ríeu/_Z ir
SFX 7F r rien/_Z ir
SFX 7F eixir ïsca/_Z ir
SFX 7F eixir ïsqui/_Z ir
SFX 7F eixir ïxi/_Z ir
SFX 7F eixir ïsques/_Z ir
SFX 7F eixir ïsquis/_Z ir
SFX 7F eixir ïxis/_Z ir
SFX 7F eixir ïsca/_Z ir
SFX 7F eixir ïsqui/_Z ir
SFX 7F eixir ïxi/_Z ir
SFX 7F r m/_Z ir
SFX 7F eixir ïsquem/_Z ir
SFX 7F r u/_Z ir
SFX 7F eixir ïsqueu/_Z ir
SFX 7F eixir ïsquen/_Z ir
SFX 7F eixir ïsquin/_Z ir
SFX 7F eixir ïxin/_Z ir
SFX 7F ir ís/_Z ir
SFX 7F eixir ïsqués/_Z ir
SFX 7F r ra/_Z ir
SFX 7F eixir ïsquera/_Z ir
SFX 7F r ssis/_Z ir
SFX 7F eixir ïsquessis/_Z ir
SFX 7F r res/_Z ir
SFX 7F eixir ïsqueres/_Z ir
SFX 7F r sses/_Z ir
SFX 7F eixir ïsquesses/_Z ir
SFX 7F ir ís/_Z ir
SFX 7F eixir ïsqués/_Z ir
SFX 7F r ra/_Z ir
SFX 7F eixir ïsquera/_Z ir
SFX 7F ir íssim/_Z ir
SFX 7F eixir ïsquéssim/_Z ir
SFX 7F ir írem/_Z ir
SFX 7F eixir ïsquérem/_Z ir
SFX 7F ir íssem/_Z ir
SFX 7F eixir ïsquéssem/_Z ir
SFX 7F ir íssiu/_Z ir
SFX 7F eixir ïsquéssiu/_Z ir
SFX 7F ir íreu/_Z ir
SFX 7F eixir ïsquéreu/_Z ir
SFX 7F ir ísseu/_Z ir
SFX 7F eixir ïsquésseu/_Z ir
SFX 7F r ssin/_Z ir
SFX 7F eixir ïsquessin/_Z ir
SFX 7F r ren/_Z ir
SFX 7F eixir ïsqueren/_Z ir
SFX 7F r ssen/_Z ir
SFX 7F eixir ïsquessen/_Z ir
SFX 7F eixir ïx/_C ir
SFX 7F eixir ïsca/_D ir
SFX 7F eixir ïxi/_D ir
SFX 7F r m/_C ir
SFX 7F r u/_C ir
SFX 7F eixir ïsquen/_C ir
SFX 7F eixir ïxin/_C ir
